Utah statutes.
77-41-107.   Penalties.

(1)  An offender who knowingly fails to register under this chapter or provides false or incomplete information is guilty of:

(a)  a third degree felony and shall be sentenced to serve a term of incarceration for not less than 90 days and also at least one year of probation if:

(i)  the offender is required to register for a felony conviction or adjudicated delinquent for what would be a felony if the juvenile were an adult of an offense listed in Subsection 77-41-102(9)(a) or (16)(a); or

(ii)  the offender is required to register for the offender's lifetime under Subsection 77-41-105(3)(c); or

(b)  a class A misdemeanor and shall be sentenced to serve a term of incarceration for not fewer than 90 days and also at least one year of probation if the offender is required to register for a misdemeanor conviction or is adjudicated delinquent for what would be a misdemeanor if the juvenile were an adult of an offense listed in Subsection 77-41-102(9)(a) or (16)(a).

(2)  Neither the court nor the Board of Pardons and Parole may release a person who violates this chapter from serving the term required under Subsection (1).  This Subsection (2) supersedes any other provision of the law contrary to this chapter.

(3)  The offender shall register for an additional year for every year in which the offender does not comply with the registration requirements of this chapter.

